Hawaii statutes.
[§554B-22] Severability. If any
provision of this chapter or its application to any person or circumstance is
held invalid, the invalidity does not affect other provisions or applications
of this chapter which can be given effect without the invalid provision or
application, and to this end the provisions of this chapter are severable. [L
1989, c 76, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol12_Ch0501-0588
Next